Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $8,810,156,745 for the State School Fund.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$646,538,037 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Education for the State School Fund.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$41,350,395 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from fees,  moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal funds and funds de-
scribed in section  4 of this 2023 Act, collected or received by the department for the State
School Fund.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$701,954,823 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from fees,  moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or
received by the department for the State  School Fund from the Fund for Student Success
established under ORS 327.001.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding ORS 327.008 and 327.013, for the biennium beginning  July
1, 2023, the Department of Education:
(1) May spend up to $968,000 from the State School  Fund for the contract described in
ORS 329.488.
(2) May spend up to $1,600,000 from the  State School Fund for purposes related to Oregon
Digital Learning.
(3) May spend up  to $3,000,000 from the State School Fund for the School Safety and
Emergency Management program.
(4) May transfer up to $4,268,766 from the State School Fund to the Oregon Military  De-
partment for the Oregon Youth Challenge Program.
Enrolled House Bill 5015 (HB 5015-A) Page 1
SECTION 6. The amount of $4,000,000 is  transferred from the State School Fund to the
Local Option Equalization Grants Account created in ORS 327.339.
SECTION 7. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House June 7, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5015 (HB 5015-A) Page 2